test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     jooweshk: jooweshk
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1jooweshk: nijooweshk
     +Px2jooweshk: gijooweshk
     +Px3jooweshk: ojooweshk
     +PxIndefjooweshk: ijooweshk
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     jooweshk+Dim: jooweshkens
     jooweshk+Con: jooweshkenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     jooweshk+Pos: jooweshkim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     jooweshk+Pej: jooweshkish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     jooweshk+Pos1Pl: jooweshkinaan
     jooweshk+PosPl: jooweshkiwaa
     jooweshk+PosObv: jooweshkini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     jooweshk+Pret: jooweshkiban
     jooweshk+VocPl: jooweshk***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     jooweshk+Obv: jooweshkan
     jooweshk+Pl: jooweshkag
     jooweshk+Loc: jooweshking
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim: nijooweshkens
     +Px1jooweshk+Con: nijooweshkenh
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim: gijooweshkens
     +Px2jooweshk+Con: gijooweshkenh
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim: ojooweshkens
     +Px3jooweshk+Con: ojooweshkenh
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim: ijooweshkens
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con: ijooweshkenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos: nijooweshkim
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos: gijooweshkim
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos: ojooweshkim
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos: ijooweshkim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej: nijooweshkish
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej: gijooweshkish
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej: ojooweshkish
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej: ijooweshkish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos1Pl: nijooweshkinaan
     +Px1jooweshk+PosPl: nijooweshkiwaa
     +Px1jooweshk+PosObv: nijooweshkini
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos1Pl: gijooweshkinaan
     +Px2jooweshk+PosPl: gijooweshkiwaa
     +Px2jooweshk+PosObv: gijooweshkini
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos1Pl: ojooweshkinaan
     +Px3jooweshk+PosPl: ojooweshkiwaa
     +Px3jooweshk+PosObv: ojooweshkini
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos1Pl: ijooweshkinaan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosPl: ijooweshkiwaa
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosObv: ijooweshkini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1jooweshk+Pret: nijooweshkiban
     +Px1jooweshk+VocPl: nijooweshk***idig, idog***
     +Px2jooweshk+Pret: gijooweshkiban
     +Px2jooweshk+VocPl: gijooweshk***idig, idog***
     +Px3jooweshk+Pret: ojooweshkiban
     +Px3jooweshk+VocPl: ojooweshk***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pret: ijooweshkiban
     +PxIndefjooweshk+VocPl: ijooweshk***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1jooweshk+Obv: nijooweshkan
     +Px1jooweshk+Pl: nijooweshkag
     +Px1jooweshk+Loc: nijooweshking
     +Px2jooweshk+Obv: gijooweshkan
     +Px2jooweshk+Pl: gijooweshkag
     +Px2jooweshk+Loc: gijooweshking
     +Px3jooweshk+Obv: ojooweshkan
     +Px3jooweshk+Pl: ojooweshkag
     +Px3jooweshk+Loc: ojooweshking
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Obv: ijooweshkan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pl: ijooweshkag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Loc: ijooweshking
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos: jooweshkensim
     jooweshk+Con+Pos: jooweshkenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej: jooweshkensish
     jooweshk+Con+Pej: jooweshkenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl: jooweshkensinaan
     jooweshk+Dim+PosPl: jooweshkensiwaa
     jooweshk+Dim+PosObv: jooweshkensini
     jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl: jooweshkenhinaan
     jooweshk+Con+PosPl: jooweshkenhiwaa
     jooweshk+Con+PosObv: jooweshkenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     jooweshk+Dim+Pret: jooweshkensiban
     jooweshk+Dim+VocPl: jooweshkens***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pret: jooweshkenhiban
     jooweshk+Con+VocPl: jooweshkenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Obv: jooweshkensan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pl: jooweshkensag
     jooweshk+Dim+Loc: jooweshkensing
     jooweshk+Con+Obv: jooweshkenhan
     jooweshk+Con+Pl: jooweshkenhag
     jooweshk+Con+Loc: jooweshkenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej: jooweshkimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl: jooweshkiminaan
     jooweshk+Pos+PosPl: jooweshkimiwaa
     jooweshk+Pos+PosObv: jooweshkimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     jooweshk+Pos+Pret: jooweshkimiban
     jooweshk+Pos+VocPl: jooweshkim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     jooweshk+Pos+Obv: jooweshkiman
     jooweshk+Pos+Pl: jooweshkimag
     jooweshk+Pos+Loc: jooweshkiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl: jooweshkishinaan
     jooweshk+Pej+PosPl: jooweshkishiwaa
     jooweshk+Pej+PosObv: jooweshkishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     jooweshk+Pej+Pret: jooweshkishiban
     jooweshk+Pej+VocPl: jooweshkish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     jooweshk+Pej+Obv: jooweshkishan
     jooweshk+Pej+Pl: jooweshkishag
     jooweshk+Pej+Loc: jooweshkishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     jooweshk+Pos1Pl+Pret: jooweshkinaaniban
     jooweshk+Pos1Pl+VocPl: jooweshkinaan***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+PosPl+Pret: jooweshkiwaaiban
     jooweshk+PosPl+VocPl: jooweshkiwaa***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+PosObv+Pret: jooweshkiniiban
     jooweshk+PosObv+VocPl: jooweshkini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     jooweshk+Pos1Pl+Obv: jooweshkinaanan
     jooweshk+Pos1Pl+Pl: jooweshkinaanag
     jooweshk+Pos1Pl+Loc: jooweshkinaaning
     jooweshk+PosPl+Obv: jooweshkiwaaan
     jooweshk+PosPl+Pl: jooweshkiwaaag
     jooweshk+PosPl+Loc: jooweshkiwaaing
     jooweshk+PosObv+Obv: jooweshkinian
     jooweshk+PosObv+Pl: jooweshkiniag
     jooweshk+PosObv+Loc: jooweshkiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     jooweshk+Pret+Obv: jooweshkibanan
     jooweshk+Pret+Pl: jooweshkibanag
     jooweshk+Pret+Loc: jooweshkibaning
     jooweshk+VocPl+Obv: jooweshk***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+VocPl+Pl: jooweshk***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+VocPl+Loc: jooweshk***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+Pos: nijooweshkensim
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+Pos: nijooweshkenhim
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos: gijooweshkensim
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos: gijooweshkenhim
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos: ojooweshkensim
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos: ojooweshkenhim
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos: ijooweshkensim
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos: ijooweshkenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+Pej: nijooweshkensish
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+Pej: nijooweshkenhish
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pej: gijooweshkensish
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pej: gijooweshkenhish
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pej: ojooweshkensish
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pej: ojooweshkenhish
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pej: ijooweshkensish
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pej: ijooweshkenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl: nijooweshkensinaan
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+PosPl: nijooweshkensiwaa
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+PosObv: nijooweshkensini
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl: nijooweshkenhinaan
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+PosPl: nijooweshkenhiwaa
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+PosObv: nijooweshkenhini
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl: gijooweshkensinaan
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+PosPl: gijooweshkensiwaa
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+PosObv: gijooweshkensini
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl: gijooweshkenhinaan
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+PosPl: gijooweshkenhiwaa
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+PosObv: gijooweshkenhini
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl: ojooweshkensinaan
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+PosPl: ojooweshkensiwaa
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+PosObv: ojooweshkensini
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl: ojooweshkenhinaan
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+PosPl: ojooweshkenhiwaa
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+PosObv: ojooweshkenhini
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl: ijooweshkensinaan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+PosPl: ijooweshkensiwaa
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+PosObv: ijooweshkensini
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl: ijooweshkenhinaan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+PosPl: ijooweshkenhiwaa
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+PosObv: ijooweshkenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+Pret: nijooweshkensiban
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+VocPl: nijooweshkens***idig, idog***
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+Pret: nijooweshkenhiban
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+VocPl: nijooweshkenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pret: gijooweshkensiban
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+VocPl: gijooweshkens***idig, idog***
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pret: gijooweshkenhiban
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+VocPl: gijooweshkenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pret: ojooweshkensiban
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+VocPl: ojooweshkens***idig, idog***
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pret: ojooweshkenhiban
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+VocPl: ojooweshkenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pret: ijooweshkensiban
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+VocPl: ijooweshkens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pret: ijooweshkenhiban
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+VocPl: ijooweshkenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+Obv: nijooweshkensan
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+Pl: nijooweshkensag
     +Px1jooweshk+Dim+Loc: nijooweshkensing
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+Obv: nijooweshkenhan
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+Pl: nijooweshkenhag
     +Px1jooweshk+Con+Loc: nijooweshkenhing
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Obv: gijooweshkensan
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pl: gijooweshkensag
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Loc: gijooweshkensing
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Obv: gijooweshkenhan
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pl: gijooweshkenhag
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Loc: gijooweshkenhing
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Obv: ojooweshkensan
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pl: ojooweshkensag
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Loc: ojooweshkensing
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Obv: ojooweshkenhan
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pl: ojooweshkenhag
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Loc: ojooweshkenhing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Obv: ijooweshkensan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pl: ijooweshkensag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Loc: ijooweshkensing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Obv: ijooweshkenhan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pl: ijooweshkenhag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Loc: ijooweshkenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+Pej: nijooweshkimish
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+Pej: gijooweshkimish
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+Pej: ojooweshkimish
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+Pej: ijooweshkimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl: nijooweshkiminaan
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+PosPl: nijooweshkimiwaa
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+PosObv: nijooweshkimini
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl: gijooweshkiminaan
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+PosPl: gijooweshkimiwaa
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+PosObv: gijooweshkimini
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl: ojooweshkiminaan
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+PosPl: ojooweshkimiwaa
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+PosObv: ojooweshkimini
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl: ijooweshkiminaan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+PosPl: ijooweshkimiwaa
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+PosObv: ijooweshkimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+Pret: nijooweshkimiban
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+VocPl: nijooweshkim***idig, idog***
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+Pret: gijooweshkimiban
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+VocPl: gijooweshkim***idig, idog***
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+Pret: ojooweshkimiban
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+VocPl: ojooweshkim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+Pret: ijooweshkimiban
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+VocPl: ijooweshkim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+Obv: nijooweshkiman
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+Pl: nijooweshkimag
     +Px1jooweshk+Pos+Loc: nijooweshkiming
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+Obv: gijooweshkiman
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+Pl: gijooweshkimag
     +Px2jooweshk+Pos+Loc: gijooweshkiming
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+Obv: ojooweshkiman
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+Pl: ojooweshkimag
     +Px3jooweshk+Pos+Loc: ojooweshkiming
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+Obv: ijooweshkiman
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+Pl: ijooweshkimag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pos+Loc: ijooweshkiming
     
